Florida, session 2026, HB799.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 218.137, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
218.137 Offset for ad valorem tax revenue loss affecting
fiscally constrained counties.—
(1) Beginning in the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the
Legislature shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in
ad valorem tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained
counties, as defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct
result of the implementation of the amendment to s. 3(a), Art.
VII of the State Constitution approved at the November 2026
general election. The moneys appropriated for this purpose shall
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb799-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 799 2026
be distributed in January of each fiscal year among the fiscally
constrained counties based on each county's proportion of the
total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the
implementation of the amendment to s. 3(a), Art. VII of the
State Constitution.
(2) On or before November 15 of each year, each fiscally
constrained county shall apply to the Department of Revenue to
participate in the distribution of the appropriation and provide
documentation supporting the county's estimated reduction in ad
valorem tax revenue in the form and manner prescribed by the
Department of Revenue. The documentation must include an
estimate of the reduction in taxable value directly attributable
to the amendment to s. 3(a), Art. VII of the State Constitution
approved at the November 2026 general election for all county
taxing jurisdictions within the county and must be prepared by
the property appraiser in each fiscally constrained county. The
documentation must also include the county millage rates
applicable in all such jurisdictions for the current year and
the prior year, rolled-back rates determined as provided in s.
200.065 for each county taxing jurisdiction, and maximum millage
rates that could have been levied by majority vote pursuant to
s. 200.065(5). For purposes of this section, each fiscally
constrained county's reduction in ad valorem tax revenue shall
be calculated as 95 percent of the estimated reduction in
taxable value multiplied by the lesser of the 2026 applicable
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb799-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 799 2026
millage rate or the applicable millage rate for each county
taxing jurisdiction in the current year. If a fiscally
constrained county fails to apply for the distribution, its
share shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was
made.
Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027, if
the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by CS/HJR 1215,
as adopted at the 2025 Regular Session, is approved at the next
general election or at an earlier special election specifically
authorized by law for that purpose.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb799-00